Montana, session 2025, SB393.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Allocation. Money must be allocated from the general fund to the office of budget and
program planning to provide reimbursement for expenditures resulting from the enforcement of felony criminal
jurisdiction on the Flathead Indian reservation.
Section 2. Distribution of funds. The office of budget and program planning shall distribute the
amount allocated under [section 1] to Lake County and the Confederated Salish and Kootenai tribes upon
satisfaction of the following conditions:
(1) $250,000 must be distributed on or before July 31, 2025, to Lake County and $250,000 must
be distributed to the Confederated Salish and Kootenai tribes if the board of county commissioners of Lake
County has rescinded and vacated "Resolution No. 22-42(a) to Withdraw from Public Law 280" adopted
January 3, 2023. The right of the board of county commissioners of Lake County to withdraw consent to
enforce criminal jurisdiction pursuant to 2-1-306(3) may not be further exercised by the board until the later of:
(a) June 1, 2027; or
(b) June 30, 2028, if the termination date provided in section 5, Chapter 556, Laws of 2021, is
extended beyond June 30, 2027.
(2) The balance of the appropriation for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, must be distributed
in equal amounts to Lake County and to the Confederated Salish and Kootenai tribes within 30 days of the
entrance into an agreement between the state of Montana, Lake County, and the Confederated Salish and
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 393
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB 393
Kootenai tribes addressing the sharing of costs between Lake County and the Confederated Salish and
Kootenai tribes associated with the implementation of Public Law 280 within Lake County, including provisions
relating to the expenditure of the amount allocated under [section 1] for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025,
and for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026.
(3) The appropriation for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, must be distributed in equal
amounts to Lake County and to the Confederated Salish and Kootenai tribes by July 31, 2026, subject to
confirmation by the office of budget and program planning of substantial compliance by all parties with the
terms of the agreement between the state of Montana, Lake County, and the Confederated Salish and Kootenai
tribes.
Section 3. Appropriation. There is appropriated $6 million from the general fund to the office of
budget and program planning for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for the purpose provided for in [section
1].
Section 4. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 393
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 393, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 393
INTRODUCED BY G. HERTZ
AN ACT PROVIDING FUNDING FOR REIMBURSEMENTS FOR FELONY CRIMINAL JURISDICTION ON THE
FLATHEAD INDIAN RESERVATION; PROVIDING AN APPROPRIATION; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE
EFFECTIVE DATE.”